nb: Drivstoffiltermontering/forbindelsestype: Banjobolt-kobling; Patron (i hus); Klemringskobling; Flenskobling; Tankfilter/sokk; I linje (slangenippel); I linje (hurtigkobling); Trykk-og-koble; Spinn-på (gjenget); Annet
tr: Yakıt filtresi montaj/bağlantı türü: Banjo cıvata bağlantısı; Kartuş (gövde içi); Sıkıştırmalı bağlantı elemanı; Havşalı bağlantı elemanı; Depo içi süzgeç; Hat içi (hortum ucu); Hat içi (hızlı bağlantı); İtmeli bağlantı; Çevirmeli (dişli); Diğer
nl: Brandstoffilter montage-/aansluittype: Banjoboutfitting; Patroon (in behuizing); Knelkoppeling; Flare-fitting; Zeef/zak in tank; Inline (slangtule); Inline (snelkoppeling); Steekkoppeling; Opschroef (met schroefdraad); Anders
zh-CN: 燃油滤清器安装/连接类型: 空心螺栓接头; 滤芯（外壳内）; 压紧接头; 扩口接头; 油箱内粗滤器/滤网; 串联式（软管倒刺接头）; 串联式（快速接头）; 插接式; 旋装式（螺纹式）; 其他
vi: Kiểu lắp/kết nối bộ lọc nhiên liệu: Đầu nối bu lông banjo; Hộp mực (trong vỏ); Đầu nối ren nén; Đầu nối ống loe; Lưới lọc/túi lọc trong bình chứa; Nối tiếp (đầu đuôi chuột); Nối tiếp (kết nối nhanh); Nhấn để kết nối; Xoay vào (có ren); Khác
bg-BG: Тип монтаж/свързване на горивния филтър: Банджо болт фитинг; Патрон (в корпус); Компресионен фитинг; Конусен фитинг; Цедка за резервоар (тип „чорап“); Линеен (щуцер за маркуч); Линеен (бърза връзка); Бърза връзка чрез натискане; Навиващ се (на резба); Друго
en: Fuel filter mounting/connection type: Banjo bolt fitting; Cartridge (in housing); Compression fitting; Flare fitting; In-tank strainer/sock; Inline (hose barb); Inline (quick-connect); Push-to-connect; Spin-on (threaded); Other
zh-TW: 燃油濾清器安裝/連接類型: 班卓螺栓接頭; 濾芯 (在外殼內); 壓縮接頭; 喇叭口接頭; 槽內濾網/濾袋; 直列式 (軟管倒刺); 直列式 (快速接頭); 快插接頭; 旋裝式 (螺紋); 其他
sv: Bränslefiltermontering/kopplingstyp: Banjobultskoppling; Insats (i hölje); Kompressionskoppling; Flänskoppling; Sil/strumpa i tanken; Inline (slangnippel); Inline (snabbkoppling); Instickskoppling; Skruvfilter (gängat); Övrigt
sl-SI: Vrsta montaže/povezave filtra za gorivo: Priključek banjo vijaka; Kartuša (v ohišju); Kompresijski priključek; Razširjen priključek; Cedilo/mrežica v rezervoarju; V liniji (cevni priključek); V liniji (hitra spojka); Na potisk; Navojni (spin-on); Drugo
ko: 연료 필터 장착/연결 방식: 반조 볼트 피팅; 카트리지(하우징 내부); 압축 피팅; 플레어 피팅; 연료탱크 내 스트레이너/필터망; 인라인(호스 바브); 인라인(퀵 커넥트); 푸시 투 커넥트; 스핀온(나사형); 기타
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem/conexão do filtro de combustível: Conexão de parafuso banjo; Cartucho (na carcaça); Conexão de compressão; Conexão flangeada; Filtro/tela no tanque; Em linha (espigão para mangueira); Em linha (conexão rápida); Conexão por pressão; Rosqueável (com rosca); Outro
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem/ligação do filtro de combustível: Encaixe de parafuso banjo; Cartucho (na estrutura); Encaixe de compressão; Encaixe cónico; Filtro de tanque; Em linha (espigão de mangueira); Em linha (engate rápido); Encaixe de pressão; De enroscar (roscado); Outro
th: ประเภทการติดตั้ง/การเชื่อมต่อตัวกรองน้ำมันเชื้อเพลิง: ข้อต่อแบนโจ; คาร์ทริดจ์ (ในตัวเรือน); ข้อต่อตาไก่; ข้อต่อแฟลร์; กรองหยาบในถัง / กรองถุงเท้า; อินไลน์ (ข้อต่อสวมสายยาง); อินไลน์ (สวมเร็ว); ข้อต่อแบบกดเข้า; สปินออน (เกลียว); อื่นๆ
ru: Тип монтажа/соединения топливного фильтра: Банджо-фитинг; Картридж (в корпусе); Компрессионный фитинг; Фитинг под развальцовку; Сетчатый фильтр грубой очистки (в баке); Магистральный (штуцер под шланг); Магистральный (быстросъемный); Цанговый (push-to-connect); Накручиваемый (с резьбой); Другое
fi: Polttoainesuodattimen kiinnitys-/liitäntätyyppi: Banjopulttiliitäntä; Patruuna (kotelossa); Puristusliitin; Laippaliitin; Tankin sisäinen sihti/sukka; Linjassa (letkukara); Linjassa (pikaliitin); Työnnettävä liitin; Kierrettävä (kierteillä); Muu
de: Montage-/Anschlussart des Kraftstofffilters: Hohlschraubenanschluss; Kartusche (im Gehäuse); Klemmringverschraubung; Bördelanschluss; In-Tank-Sieb/Filterstrumpf; Inline (Schlauchtülle); Inline (Schnellkupplung); Steckanschluss; Anschraubbar (Gewinde); Sonstige
it: Tipo di montaggio/connessione del filtro carburante: Raccordo a bocchettone (banjo); Cartuccia (nell’alloggiamento); Raccordo a compressione; Raccordo svasato; Filtro a calza nel serbatoio; In linea (portagomma); In linea (attacco rapido); Attacco a pressione; Avvitabile (filettato); Altro
es: Tipo de montaje o conexión del filtro de combustible: Racor de tornillo banjo; Cartucho (en carcasa); Racor de compresión; Racor abocinado; Filtro de tanque/calcetín; En línea (espiga de manguera); En línea (conexión rápida); Conexión a presión; Enroscable (con rosca); Otro
lt-LT: Kuro filtro tvirtinimo / jungties tipas: Banjo varžto jungtis; Kasetė (korpuse); Prispaudžiamoji jungtis; Valcuota jungtis; Bake esantis filtras / tinklelis; Srauto (žarnos antgalis); Srauto (greito jungimo); Įstumiama; Užsukama (srieginė); Kita
hr-HR: Montaža/tip filtera goriva: Priključak za banjo vijak; Uložak (u kućištu); Kompresijski priključak; Priključak s proširenjem; Cjedilo/mrežica u spremniku; Redni (s priključkom za crijevo); Redni (s brzim priključkom); Na utiskivanje (Push-to-connect); Navojni (spin-on); Ostalo
ja: 燃料フィルター装着／連携タイプ: バンジョーボルト継手; カートリッジ (ハウジング内); 圧縮継手; フレア継手; タンク内ストレーナー/ソックス; インライン (ホースバーブ); インライン (クイックコネクト); プッシュ・トゥ・コネクト; スピンオン (スレッド); その他
sk-SK: Typ montáže/pripojenia palivového filtra: Pripojenie typu banjo; Vložka (v kryte); Zverné šróbenie; Pertlované pripojenie; Sitko v nádrži (ponožka); Radové (hadicový tŕň); Radové (rýchlospojka); Násuvné; Naskrutkovacie (závitové); Iné
ro-RO: Tip de montare/conectare a filtrului de combustibil: Racord cu șurub Banjo; Cartuș (în carcasă); Racord de compresiune; Racord cu cap evazat; Sită/filtru în rezervor; Pe conductă (niplu furtun); Pe conductă (conectare rapidă); Conectare prin împingere; Prin înfiletare (cu filet); Altele
pl: Typ mocowania/połączenia filtra paliwa: Śruba drążona (banjo); Wkład (w obudowie); Złączka zaciskowa; Złączka kielichowa; Smok w zbiorniku paliwa; Przewodowy (króciec na wąż); Przewodowy (szybkozłącze); Złączka wtykowa; Nakręcany (gwintowany); Inne
da: Monterings- og tilslutningstype for brændstoffilter: Banjo-boltbeslag; Indsats (i hus); Kompressionsfitting; Kravefitting; Si/filter i tank; In-line (slangestuds); In-line (quick-connect); Push-to-connect; Spin-on (med gevind); Andet
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης/σύνδεσης φίλτρου καυσίμου: Εξάρτημα βίδας banjo; Φυσίγγιο (σε περίβλημα); Εξάρτημα συμπίεσης; Εξάρτημα εκτόνωσης; Σίτα/φίλτρο εντός του ρεζερβουάρ; Εν σειρά (ακροφύσιο σωλήνα); Εν σειρά (ταχυσύνδεσμος); Κουμπωτό; Βιδωτό (με σπείρωμα); Άλλο
cs: Typ montáže/propojení palivového filtru: Šroubení Banjo; Vložka (v krytu); Svěrné šroubení; Lemové šroubení; Sítko / filtrační ponožka do nádrže; Průtokové (hadicový trn); Průtokové (rychlospojka); Nástrčné šroubení; Šroubovací (závitové); Ostatní
hu: Üzemanyagszűrő felszerelés/csatlakozás típusa: Áteresztő csavaros (banjo) csatlakozó; Patronos (házba épített); Szorítógyűrűs csatlakozó; Peremes csatlakozó; Tartályba épített szűrő/háló; Soros (tömlővéges); Soros (gyorscsatlakozós); Dugaszolható csatlakozó; Rácsavarható (menetes); Egyéb
fr: Type de montage ou de raccordement du filtre à carburant: Raccord à boulon banjo; Cartouche (dans boîtier); Raccord à compression; Raccord évasé; Crépine de réservoir; En ligne (raccord cannelé); En ligne (raccord rapide); Raccord enfichable; À visser (fileté); Autre